Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1821.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. World War II Veteran Pvt. Wilbur Russell Rea Memorial Bridge.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Wilbur Russell Rea, born in Irvona on May 1, 1924, was the son of Herbert Bloom Rea and Mary Elizabeth Bone Rea.(2) Pvt. Rea graduated from Coalport Irvona High School.(3) Pvt. Rea enjoyed working on cars and farm equipment.(4) Pvt. Rea entered the service under the United States Army's 96th Division, Company B, 381st Infantry.(5) Pvt. Rea was killed in action on April 16, 1945, in Okinawa, Japan.(b) Designation.--The bridge, identified as Bridge Key 12345678910111213141516171819 69488, carrying State Route 3005 over North Witmer Run in Irvona Borough, Clearfield County, is designated as the World War II Veteran Pvt. Wilbur Russell Rea Memorial Bridge.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the bridge to traffic in both directions on the bridge.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1821PN2241 - 2 - 12345678